North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 4. Placing or Adoption of Juvenile Delinquents or Dependents. [Repealed]

§§ 110-50 through 110-57.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998, c. 202, s. 5, effective July 1, 1999.

Cross References.

As to placing or adoption of juvenile delinquents or dependents, see now

G.S. 7B-3700

et seq.